test/porter.sbl
/*
Copyright (c) 2001-2006, Dr Martin Porter and Richard Boulton. All rights
reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without
modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions
are met:
1. Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
2. Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the
   documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
3. Neither the name of the Snowball project nor the names of its contributors
   may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software
   without specific prior written permission.

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND
ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR
ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES
(INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR SERVICES;
LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON
ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT
(INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE OF THIS
SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.
*/


integers ( p1 p2 )
booleans ( Y_found )

routines (
   shortv
   R1 R2
   Step_1a Step_1b Step_1c Step_2 Step_3 Step_4 Step_5a Step_5b
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( v v_WXY )

define v        'aeiouy'
define v_WXY    v + 'wxY'

backwardmode (

    define shortv as ( non-v_WXY v non-v )

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define Step_1a as (
        [substring] among (
            'sses' (<-'ss')
            'ies'  (<-'i')
            'ss'   ()
            's'    (delete)
        )
    )

    define Step_1b as (
        [substring] among (
            'eed'  (R1 <-'ee')
            'ed'
            'ing' (
                test gopast v  delete
                test substring among(
                    'at' 'bl' 'iz'
                         (<+ 'e')
                    'bb' 'dd' 'ff' 'gg' 'mm' 'nn' 'pp' 'rr' 'tt'
                    // ignoring double c, h, j, k, q, v, w, and x
                         ([next]  delete)
                    ''   (atmark p1  test shortv  <+ 'e')
                )
            )
        )
    )

    define Step_1c as (
        ['y' or 'Y']
        gopast v
        <-'i'
    )

    define Step_2 as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            'tional'  (<-'tion')
            'enci'    (<-'ence')
            'anci'    (<-'ance')
            'abli'    (<-'able')
            'entli'   (<-'ent')
            'eli'     (<-'e')
            'izer' 'ization'
                      (<-'ize')
            'ational' 'ation' 'ator'
                      (<-'ate')
            'alli'    (<-'al')
            'alism' 'aliti'
                      (<-'al')
            'fulness' (<-'ful')
            'ousli' 'ousness'
                      (<-'ous')
            'iveness' 'iviti'
                      (<-'ive')
            'biliti'  (<-'ble')
        )
    )

    define Step_3 as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            'alize'   (<-'al')
            'icate' 'iciti' 'ical'
                      (<-'ic')
            'ative' 'ful' 'ness'
                      (delete)
        )
    )

    define Step_4 as (
        [substring] R2 among (
            'al' 'ance' 'ence' 'er' 'ic' 'able' 'ible' 'ant' 'ement'
            'ment' 'ent' 'ou' 'ism' 'ate' 'iti' 'ous' 'ive' 'ize'
                      (delete)
            'ion'     ('s' or 't' delete)
        )
    )

    define Step_5a as (
        ['e']
        R2 or (R1 not shortv)
        delete
    )

    define Step_5b as (
        ['l']
        R2 'l'
        delete
    )
)

define stem as (

    unset Y_found
    do ( ['y'] <-'Y' set Y_found)
    do repeat(goto (v ['y']) <-'Y' set Y_found)

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do(
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
    )

    backwards (
        do Step_1a
        do Step_1b
        do Step_1c
        do Step_2
        do Step_3
        do Step_4
        do Step_5a
        do Step_5b
    )

    do(Y_found  repeat(goto (['Y']) <-'y'))

)
